sv: Våffelstil: Djur; Belgiskt; Bubbla (Hongkong); Klassisk; Hjärta; Mini; Square ficka; Stift; Tunt; Annat
da: Vaffelstil: Dyr; Belgisk; Boble (Hongkong); Klassisk; Hjerte; Mini; Square pocket; Pind; Tyndt; Andet
th: รูปแบบวาฟเฟิล: สัตว์; เบลเยียม; บับเบิล (สไตล์ฮ่องกง); แบบคลาสสิก; หัวใจ; ขนาดเล็ก; ลายช่องสี่เหลี่ยม; แท่ง; บาง; อื่นๆ
nb: Vaffelstil: Dyr; Belgisk; Boble (Hong Kong); Klassisk; Hjerte; Mini; Firkantet lomme; Pinne; Tynn; Annet
sk-SK: Vzor vafle: Zviera; Belgický; Bublinové (Hongkonské); Klasický; Srdcový; Mini; Štvorcové jamky; Tyčinka; Tenký; Iné
sl-SI: Slog vaflja: Žival; Belgijski; Mehurček (Hong Kong); Klasična; Srce; Mini; Square žep; Palica; Tanka; Druga
es: Estilo gofre: Animal; Belga; Burbuja (Hong Kong); Clásico; Corazón; Mini; Bolsillo cuadrado; Palillo; Fino; Otros
fi: Vohvelin tyyli: Eläimenmuotoinen; Belgialainen; Kupla (Hongkong); Klassinen; Sydämenmuotoinen; Mini; Neliönmuotoinen tasku; Tikussa; Ohut; Muu
zh-TW: 鬆餅樣式: 動物; 比利時式; 雞蛋仔 (香港); 經典; 心形; 迷你; 方形; 棒狀; 薄鬆餅; 其他
de: Waffelstil: Tier; Belgisch; Bubble (Hongkong); Klassisch; Herz; Mini; Quadratische Tasche; Stick; Dünn; Sonstiges
ja: ワッフルのスタイル: 動物型; ベルギーワッフル; バブル（香港）; クラシック; ハート; ミニ; スクエアポケット; スティック; 薄い; その他
zh-CN: 华夫格纹的样式: 动物; 比利时式; 气泡（香港）; 经典; 心形; 迷你; 方格; 棒状; 薄形; 其他
tr: Waffle stili: Hayvan; Belçika usulü; Balon (Hong Kong); Klasik; Kalp; Mini; Kare cep; Çubuk; İnce; Diğer
ko: 와플 패턴 스타일: 동물; 벨지언; 버블(홍콩); 클래식; 하트; 미니; 사각 격자무늬; 막대; 얇은; 기타
bg-BG: Тип вафла: Животно; Белгийско; С формата на балончета (Хонконг); Класически; Сърце; Мини; На квадратчета; Стик; Тънко; Друго
vi: Kiểu bánh quế: Động vật; Kiểu Bỉ; Kiểu bong bóng (Hồng Kông); Cổ điển; Trái tim; Mini; Túi vuông; Nén; Mỏng; Khác
pt-PT: Estilo waffle: Animal; Belga; Bolha (Hong Kong); Clássico; Coração; Mini; Bolso quadrado; Palito; Fino; Outro
fr: Style de gaufre: Animal; Belge; Bulle (Hong Kong); Classique; Cœur; Mini; Poches carrées; Bâton; Fin; Autre
hr-HR: Stil vafla: Životinja; Belgijski; Bubble (Hong Kong); Klasični; Srce; Mini; Kvadratni džepovi; Štapić; Tanko; Ostalo
nl: Wafelstijl: Dier; Belgisch; Bubble (Hongkong); Klassiek; Hart; Mini; Vierkant patroon; Stick; Dun; Overig
cs: Vzhled vaflí: Tvar zvířete; Belgické vafle; S bublinkami (Hongkong); Klasické; Srdce; Mini; S mřížkami; Na špejli; Tenké; Jiné
pt-BR: Estilo de waffle: Animal; Belga; Formato bolha (Hong Kong); Clássico; Coração; Mini; Bolso quadrado; Vareta; Ralo; Outro
el: Στυλ βάφλας: Ζώο; Βελγική; Φούσκα (Χονγκ Κονγκ); Κλασική; Καρδιά; Μίνι; Square τσέπη; Στικ; Λεπτή; Άλλο
en: Waffle style: Animal; Belgian; Bubble (Hong Kong); Classic; Heart; Mini; Square pocket; Stick; Thin; Other
lt-LT: Vaflių rašto tipas: Gyvūnai; Belgiškas; Burbuliniai (Honkongas); Klasikinis; Širdelių forma; Mini; Kvadratinė kišenė; Lazdelė; Plonas; Kita
pl: Typ waflowy: Z motywem zwierząt; Belgijskie; Bąbelkowe (Hong Kong); Klasyczne; Serce; Mini; Kwadratowe kieszenie; Na patyku; Cienkie; Inne
ru: Тип вафель: Животные; Бельгийские; Пузырьки (Гонконг); Классические; Сердечки; Мини; Квадратные кармашки; На палочке; Тонкие; Другое
hu: Gofri stílus: Állat; Belga; Buborék (Hongkong); Klasszikus; Szív; Mini; Négyzet alakú, zseb méretű; Rúd; Vékony; Egyéb
it: Stile a nido d'ape: Animale; Belga; Bolla (Hong Kong); Classico; Cuore; Mini; Tasca Square; Stick; Sottile; Altro
ro-RO: Stilul vafei: Animal; Belgian; Bule (Hong Kong); Clasic; Inimă; Mini; Buzunar pătrat; Pe băț; Subțire; Altele